test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuettoe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tüttö : # Noun 'girl/tyttö/tüdruk/девучка' - full paradigm
# Heinsoo, Heinike 2015: Vadʼdʼa sõnakopittõja. Tartu-Helsinki. (88-89).
     tüttö+N+Sg+Nom: tüttö
     tüttö+N+Sg+Gen: tütö
     tüttö+N+Sg+Par: tüttöä
     tüttö+N+Sg+Ill: tüttöse
     tüttö+N+Sg+Ine: tüttõz
     tüttö+N+Sg+Ela: tütösse
     tüttö+N+Sg+All: tütölle
     tüttö+N+Sg+Ade: tütölle
     tüttö+N+Sg+Abl: tütölte
     tüttö+N+Sg+Tra: tütössi
     tüttö+N+Sg+Ter: tüttössaa
     tüttö+N+Sg+Com: tütöka
     tüttö+N+Pl+Nom: tütöd
     tüttö+N+Pl+Gen: [tüttöi, tüttöje]
     tüttö+N+Pl+Par: [tüttöi, tüttöitõ]
     tüttö+N+Pl+Ill: tüttöise
     tüttö+N+Pl+Ine: tüttöiz
     tüttö+N+Pl+Ela: tüttöisse
     tüttö+N+Pl+All: tüttöille
     tüttö+N+Pl+Ade: tüttöille
     tüttö+N+Pl+Abl: tüttöilte
     tüttö+N+Pl+Tra: tüttöissi
     tüttö+N+Pl+Ter: tüttöissaa
     tüttö+N+Pl+Com: tüttöika
